apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="/ő__prn">
      <e><p><l>ő</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>őt</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőle</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nála</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzá</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>neki</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vele</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>érte</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>róla</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőle</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belé</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>benne</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajta</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rá</l><r>ő<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/mi__prn">
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>minket</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőlünk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nálunk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzánk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nekünk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>velünk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>értünk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rólunk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőlünk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belénk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bennünk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtunk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ránk</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ti__prn">
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>titeket</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőletej</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nálatok</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzátok</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nektek</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veletek</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>értetek</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rólatok</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőletek</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belétek</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bennetek</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtatok</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rátok</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ők__prn">
      <e><p><l>ők</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>őket</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tőlük</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>náluk</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hozzájuk</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nekik</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>velük</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>értük</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cau"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>róluk</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>belőlük</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>beléjük</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bennük</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rajtuk</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rájuk</l><r>ők<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a/z__prn">
        <e><p><l>z</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zt</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bban</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hhoz</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bba</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnal</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zon</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e/z__prn">
        <e><p><l>z</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zt</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bben</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hhez</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bbe</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnel</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zen</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kkor</l><r>kkor<s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="ő"><i></i><par n="/ő__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mi"><i></i><par n="/mi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ti"><i></i><par n="/ti__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ők"><i></i><par n="/ők__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="az"><i>a</i><par n="a/z__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ez"><i>e</i><par n="e/z__prn"/></e>
